District of Columbia statutes.
19-314

Share of posthumous children.

A right in the inheritance to real or personal property does not accrue to or vest in a person other than the children of the intestate and their descendants, unless the person is in being and capable in law to take as heir or distributee at the time of the intestate’s death; but a child or descendant of the intestate born after the death of the intestate has the same right of inheritance as if born before his death.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 699, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 19-314.
1973 Ed., § 19-314.